Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-1012
Flood plain management regulations, defined.

Flood plain management regulations shall mean and include zoning ordinances, subdivision regulations, building codes, and other applications of the police power which are authorized by law to secure safety from floods and provide for the reasonable and prudent use of flood plains.

Laws 1983, LB 35, § 12.